Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1592YH (3) 91 jm/jh H.F. 141 Section 1. Section 423.3, subsection 57, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 The sales price from all sales of food and food ingredients. 3 However, as used in this subsection , a sale of âfood and food 4 ingredientsâ does not include a sale of alcoholic beverages, 5 candy, or dietary supplements; food sold through vending 6 machines; or sales of prepared food, soft drinks, piper 7 methysticum, or tobacco. For the purposes of this subsection : 8 Sec. 2. Section 423.3, subsection 57, paragraph c, 9 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 âDietary supplementâ means any product, other than piper 12 methysticum or tobacco, intended to supplement the diet that 13 meets all of the following criteria: 14 Sec. 3. Section 423.3, subsection 57, Code 2025, is amended 15 by adding the following new paragraph: 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0f. âPiper methysticumâ means any item 17 containing traceable amounts of piper methysticum. 18